Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.210

Arrest without warrant.

The director shall have authority to arrest without warrant anywhere in the state any person found in the act of, or whom the director has reason to believe is guilty of, transporting, holding, selling, or slaughtering stolen livestock. Any person arrested by the director shall be turned over to the county sheriff or other local law enforcement officer where the arrest was made, as quickly as possible.

[ 2003 c 326 s 23; 1959 c 54 s 21.]